Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.700

Investigations and examinations—Additional authority—Scope.

(1) In addition to the authority conferred in RCW 21.20.370 the director at any time during a public offering whether registered or not, or one year thereafter or at any time that any debt or equity securities which have been sold to the public pursuant to registration under this chapter are still an outstanding obligation of the issuer: (a) May investigate the issuer for the purpose of ascertaining whether there have been violations of this chapter, rules adopted under this chapter, or any conditions imposed by the director expressed in any permit for a public offering or otherwise; (b) may visit and examine the issuer for the purpose of assuring compliance with this chapter, rules adopted under this chapter, or any conditions imposed by the director whether expressed in the permit for the public offering or otherwise; (c) may require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise as the director may determine, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated; and (d) may publish information concerning any violation of this chapter, or any rule, order, or condition adopted or imposed under this chapter.

(2) The examination or investigation, whether conducted within or without this state, shall include the right to reasonably examine the issuer's books, accounts, records, files, papers, feasibility reports, other pertinent information and obtain written permission from the issuer to consult with the independent accountant who audited the financial statements of the issuer. The reasonable costs of the examination shall be paid by the issuer to the director. The issuer shall not be liable for the costs of second or subsequent examinations during a calendar year.

[ 1988 c 244 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 171 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 244: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1988 c 244 s 18.]

Effective date—1988 c 244: "Sections 1 through 16 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1988." [ 1988 c 244 s 20.]

Implementation—Application—1988 c 244: "The director of licensing may take whatever action is necessary to implement this act on its effective date. This act applies to any person, individual, corporation, partnership, or association whether or not in existence on or prior to July 1, 1988. The director of licensing may adopt transition rules in order to allow debenture companies in existence prior to July 1, 1988, a reasonable amount of time to comply with the requirements of this act. Transition rules shall require compliance with this act not later than January 1, 1990." [ 1988 c 244 s 21.]

Investigations: RCW 21.20.370.